California statutes. Labor Code
(a) No common carrier operating more than four trains each way per day of 24 hours on any main track or branch line of railroad within this state, or on any part of a main track or branch line, shall run or permit to be run, on any part of a main track or branch line, any passenger, mail, or express train on which there is not employed at least one conductor, one brakeman, and the following:

(1) One engineer and one fireman for each diesel locomotive.

(2) One electric motorman for each train propelled or run by electricity.

(3) One motor or power control man for each train propelled by motive power other than diesel or electricity.

(4) Two brakemen, where four or more cars, exclusive of railroad officers’ private cars, are hauled.

(5) One baggageman, except on a train upon which baggage is not hauled, and on gasoline motorcars.

(b) This section does not apply to any diesel locomotive weighing 45 tons or less.

(c) Paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) does not apply where its application would conflict with the terms of a collective bargaining agreement. 

(d) Subdivision (a) does not apply to the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board or the North San Diego County Transit Development Board.

(e) With respect to commuter train service provided by the San Diego Metropolitan Transit Development Board or the North San Diego County Transit Development Board, there shall be at least one qualified crewmember inside a train car set during revenue service. For the purpose of this subdivision, “revenue service” means service during which passengers are carried or are scheduled to be carried.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 681, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6902.

(a) For purposes of this section, “revenue service” means passenger train service during which passengers are carried or are scheduled to be carried.

(b) For purposes of this section, “local agency” means any city, county, special district, or other public entity in the state, including a charter city or a charter county.

(c) Except as otherwise provided by subdivision (e) of Section 6901, during revenue service provided by a local agency, or by any entity under contract with a local agency, there shall be in addition to the train operator at least one qualified employee inside a train car set of six or fewer coaches and at least two qualified employees inside a train car set of seven or more coaches.

(d) (1) A request for proposal or request for bid to provide revenue service issued by a local agency shall require compliance with subdivision (c).

(2) A contract to provide revenue service awarded by a local agency shall require compliance with subdivision (c).

(3) If a court of competent jurisdiction determines that an entity receiving a request for proposal or request for bid from a local agency for revenue service is exempt from the requirements of this section, all other entities that received the same request for proposal or request for bid shall also be exempt from the requirements of this section in responding to that request for proposal or request for bid.

(e) This section does not apply to heavy rail transit systems that are owned or operated by a public entity, or to light rail public transit systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 976, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6903.

(a) Effective February 1, 2016, a train or light engine used in connection with the movement of freight shall not be operated unless it has a crew consisting of at least two individuals.

(b) For purposes of this section, the term “train or light engine used in connection with the movement of freight” shall not include hostler service or utility employees.

(c) The Public Utilities Commission may assess civil penalties against any person who willfully violates this section, according to the following schedule:

(1) A civil penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the first
 violation.

(2) A civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) to five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the second violation within a three-year period.

(3) A civil penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000) to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for the third violation and each subsequent violation within a three-year period.

(d) The remedies available to the commission pursuant to this section are nonexclusive and do not limit the remedies available under all other laws or pursuant to contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 283, Sec. 1.   (SB 730)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6904.

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to a locomotive or locomotives without cars, except that each locomotive shall have one engineer and one fireman when being moved in train under steam, unless the engine is disabled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

6905.

This chapter shall not apply to any relief or wrecking train in any case where a number of employees sufficient to comply with this chapter is not available for service on such relief or wrecking train.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

6906.

No common carrier shall employ any person as:

(a) A locomotive engineer who has not had at least three years’ actual service as a locomotive fireman or one year’s actual service as a locomotive engineer. 

(b) A conductor who has not had at least two years’ actual service as a railroad brakeman in road service on steam or electric railroad other than street railway, or one year’s actual service as a railroad conductor in road service.

(c) A brakeman who has not passed the regular examination required by transcontinental railroads.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

6907.

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to the running or operating of locomotives or motor power cars to and from trains at terminals by hostlers or of steam locomotives or motive power cars to and from engine houses or to the doing of work on steam locomotives or motive power cars at shops or engine-houses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

6908.

Any violation of this chapter is a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

6909.

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to the operation of any train by a common carrier during times of strikes or walkouts, participated in by any of the employees mentioned in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

6910.

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to gasoline motor cars operated exclusively on branch lines or to trains of less than three cars propelled by electricity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Safety Devices [6950. - 6956.]

6950.

On any railroad train where the engine is accompanied by a tender of the Vanderbilt or similar type of construction and where the clearance between the overhang of the roof of the cab of the engine and the top of the tender accompanying the engine is less than twenty-eight inches, an opening not less than twenty-four inches square shall be cut out in the overhang of the roof of the cab, for the purpose of enabling an engineman with safety to go from the cab of the engine to the top of the tender.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

6951.

Any railroad company operating a line in whole or in part within this state, or any receiver of any railroad, that fails to comply with any provision of section 6950 is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense. Each day that such failure continues is a separate offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 220.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

6952.

Every railroad company operating engines within any part of this state shall provide each engine cab with a substantial and safe handrail along the top on each side of the cab extending from the front to the rear of the cab. Every engine cab other than one having front windows of not less than 14 inches in width and 42 inches in height shall be provided and equipped with a substantial and safe footboard, of not less than one and one-half inches, projecting outward from each side of the cab level with the floor and extending from the front to the rear of the cab.

Any railroad company, or receiver thereof, which fails to comply with any provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of two hundred dollars ($200) for each offense.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any railroad company which issued in writing before July 2, 1921, and maintains in force, an order forbidding the engine or train crew to go from the engine cab to that portion of the engine in front of the cab while the cab is in motion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 221.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

6953.

Any electric car operated in interurban service and any electric locomotive shall be equipped exclusively with laminated safety glass in the compartment of the motorman or engineer, or if there is no compartment, the window in front of the motorman shall be so equipped, if the following conditions concur:

(a) The car or locomotive is built after the effective date of this section. 

(b) The car or locomotive is operated by an overhead wire.

(c) The car or locomotive can exceed a speed of 45 miles per hour.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 292.)
-------------------------------------------

6954.

On and after the first day of September, 1946, it shall be unlawful to operate any electric car in interurban service or any electric locomotive which is not so equipped with laminated safety glass.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 292.)
-------------------------------------------

6955.

Laminated safety glass is glass so treated or combined with other materials as to reduce, in comparison with ordinary sheet glass or plate glass, the likelihood of injury to persons, by objects from external sources, or by glass when the glass is cracked or broken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 292.)
-------------------------------------------

6956.

Any common carrier violating Sections 6953 or 6954 is guilty of a misdemeanor for each violation, punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) for each offense. Each day that any electric car is operated in interurban service or that any electric locomotive is operated, is a separate offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 222.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Trains [7000. - 7000.]

7000.

As used in this section “caboose” means a caboose forming a part of a train and occupied by employees or caretakers, or both.

If conditions warrant it for the safety of the occupants of a caboose the conductor, in using a pusher engine, may place it ahead of the caboose.

This section applies only to main line movements of over five miles.

This section shall not prevent the use of an electric locomotive at the rear of any train.

This section shall not apply in any case of casualty, unavoidable accident, or act of God; nor under circumstances which are the result of a cause not known to, and which could not have been foreseen by, the railroad corporation, or its officer or agent in charge of a train. This section shall not apply to the operation of wrecking, or relief trains.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 1060.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. SAFETY ON BUILDINGS [7100. - 7384.]



  CHAPTER 1. Buildings Under Construction or Repair [7100. - 7267.]



  ARTICLE 1. Floors and Walls [7100. - 7110.]

7100.

As used in this article, “building” means any multifloor building, other than structural steel framed building, more than two stories high in the course of construction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7101.

Every building shall have the joists, beams, or girders of floors below the floor or level where any work is being done, or about to be done, covered with flooring laid close together, or with other suitable material to protect workmen engaged in such building from falling through joists or girders, and from falling substances, whereby life or safety is endangered.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7102.

Every building which is of reinforced concrete construction, with reinforced concrete floors, shall have the floor filled in, either with forms or concrete, on each floor before the commencement of work upon the walls of the second floor above or the commencement of work upon the floor of the next floor above.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7103.

Every building having wooden floors other than a steel frame building shall have the underflooring, if double flooring is to be used, laid on each floor within the time prescribed above for reinforced concrete floors. Where single wooden floors are to be used, each floor shall be planked over within the time prescribed above for reinforced concrete floors.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7104.

If a span of a floor on a building exceeds 13 feet, an intermediate beam shall be used to support the temporary flooring, but spans not to exceed 16 feet may be covered by three-inch planks without an intermediate beam. The intermediate beam shall be of a sufficient strength to sustain a live load of 50 pounds per square foot of the area supported.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7105.

If building operations are suspended and the temporary flooring required by this article is removed, the building shall be replanked upon the resumption of work so that every man at work has a covered floor not more than two stories below.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7106.

Where a building is being constructed in sections each section constitutes a building for the purpose of this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7107.

Planked floors on buildings shall be tightly laid together of proper thickness, grade and span to carry the working load; such working load to be assumed as at least 25 pounds per square foot.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7108.

Safety belts and nets shall be required in accordance with Article 24 (commencing with Section 1669) of subchapter 4 of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Title 8 of the California Administrative Code, Construction Safety Orders of the Division of Occupational Safety and Health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676.)
-------------------------------------------

7109.

No person shall proceed with any work assigned to or undertaken by him, or require or permit any other person to proceed with work assigned to or undertaken by either, unless the planking or nets required by this article are in place. Violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7110.

The Division of Occupational Safety and Health shall enforce this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Scaffolding [7150. - 7158.]

7150.

As used in this article, “scaffolding” includes scaffolding and staging.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

7151.

If the working platform of any scaffolding swung or suspended from an overhead support is more than 10 feet above the ground, floor or area to which an employee on the scaffolding might fall, it shall have a safety rail of wood or other equally rigid material of adequate strength. The rail shall comply with the applicable orders of the Division of Occupational Safety and Health.

Suspended scaffolding shall be fastened so as to prevent the scaffolding from swaying from the building, or structure, or other object being worked on from the scaffolding. All parts of the scaffolding shall be of sufficient strength to support, bear, or withstand with safety any weight of persons, tools, appliances, or materials which might reasonably be placed on it or which are to be supported by it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676.)
-------------------------------------------

7152.

In addition to the duties imposed by any law regulating or relating to scaffolding, an employer who uses or permits the use of scaffolding described in Section 7151 in connection with construction, alteration, repairing, painting, cleaning or doing of any work upon any building or structure, shall:

(a) Furnish safety lines to tie all hooks and hangers back on the roof of such building or structure.

(b) Provide safety lines hanging from the roof, securely tied thereto, for all swinging scaffolds which rely upon stirrups of the single point suspension type to support the working platform. One such line shall be provided for each workman with a minimum of one line between each pair of hangers or falls.

The standards board may adopt occupational safety and health standards different from the requirements of this section or grant variances from these requirements if the standards or variances provide equivalent or superior safety for employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 905, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7153.

Platforms or floors of such scaffolding shall be not less than 14 inches in width and shall be free from knots or fractures impairing their strength.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 700.)
-------------------------------------------

7154.1.

The use of lean-to scaffolds, sometimes known as jack scaffolds, as support for scaffolds is hereby prohibited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 257.)
-------------------------------------------

7155.

Violation of any provision of section 7151 to 7154 inclusive is a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

7156.

Any person employing or directing another to do or perform any labor in the construction, alteration, repairing, painting, or cleaning of any house, building, or structure within this state is guilty of a misdemeanor who does any of the following:

(a) Knowingly or negligently furnishes or erects, or causes to be furnished or erected for the performance of that labor, unsafe or improper scaffolding, slings, hammers, blocks, pulleys, stays, braces, ladders, irons, ropes, or other mechanical contrivances.

(b) Hinders or obstructs any officer or inspector of the Division of Occupational Safety and Health attempting to inspect such equipment under the provisions of this article or any law or safety order of this state.

(c) Destroys or defaces, or removes any notice posted thereon by any division officer or inspector, or permits the use thereof, after the equipment has been declared unsafe by the officer or inspector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676.)
-------------------------------------------

7157.

The division may make and enforce safety orders in the manner prescribed by law, to supplement and carry into effect the purposes and provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1431.)
-------------------------------------------

7158.

The division shall enforce the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1431.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Construction Elevators [7200. - 7205.]

7200.

As used in this article:

(a) “Construction elevator” includes any means used to hoist persons or material of any kind on a building under course of construction, when operated by any power other than muscular power.

(b) “Building” includes structures of all kinds during the course of construction, regardless of the purposes for which they are intended and whether such construction be below or above the level of the ground.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

7201.

Every construction elevator used in buildings shall have a system of signals for the purpose of signaling the person operating or controlling the machinery which operates or controls the construction elevator.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

7202.

The person in charge of a building shall appoint one or more persons to give such signals. Such person shall be selected from those most familiar with the work for which the construction elevator is being used. The signaling devices provided shall be protected against unauthorized or accidental operation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

7203.

The board shall make, and may from time to time amend, general safety orders in the manner prescribed by law. Such orders shall specify and fix the nature and methods of signals and signaling devices and uniform signals to be used in this State under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1431.)
-------------------------------------------

7204.

The division shall inspect all construction elevators. If any part of the construction or system of signals used on a construction elevator is defective or endangers the lives of the persons working in the immediate vicinity of the construction elevator, the division shall direct the person in charge thereof to remedy such defect. Such construction elevator shall not be used again until the order of the division is complied with.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1431.)
-------------------------------------------

7205.

Any person, or the agent or officer thereof, who violates any provision of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 30 days and not more than six months, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 223.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Structural Steel Framed Buildings [7250. - 7267.]

7250.

As used in this article “building” means any multifloor structural steel framed building more than two stories high in the course of construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7251.

As defined above, these provisions shall apply to buildings erected in tiers or stories and shall not apply to steel framed buildings having large open spans or areas such as, mill buildings, gymnasiums, auditoriums, hangars, arenas, or stadiums.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7252.

The derrick or working floor of every building shall be solidly decked over its entire surface except for access openings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7253.

There shall be a tight and substantial temporary floor within two floors below and directly under that portion of each tier of beams on which erection, riveting, bolting, welding or painting is being done. For operations of short duration of exposure to falling, safety belts shall be required as set forth in Section 7265.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7254.

Temporary floors shall be wood planking of proper thickness, grade and span to carry the working load, but shall not be less than two inches thick, full size undressed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7255.

Provision shall be made to secure temporary flooring against displacement by strong winds or other forces.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7256.

Planks shall extend a minimum of 12 inches beyond centerline of their supports at each end.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7257.

Wire mesh or plywood (exterior grade) shall be used to cover openings adjacent to columns where planks do not fit tightly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7258.

Metal decking where used in lieu of wood planking shall be of equivalent strength and shall be laid tightly and secured to prevent movement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7259.

Floor planks that are temporarily removed for any reason whatsoever shall be replaced as soon as work requiring their removal is completed or the open area shall be properly guarded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7260.

Prior to removal of temporary floor plank, employees shall be instructed by assigned supervision the steps to be taken to perform the work safely and in proper sequence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7261.

When gathering and stacking temporary floor plank on a lower floor, in preparation for transferring such plank for use on an upper working floor, the steel erector’s personnel shall remove such plank successively, working toward the last panel of such floor, so that the work is always being done from the planked floor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7262.

When gathering and stacking temporary floor planks from the last panel, the steel erector’s personnel assigned to such work shall be protected by safety belts with life lines attached to a catenary line or other substantial anchorage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7263.

The sequence of erection, bolting, temporary guying, riveting and welding shall be such as to maintain the stability of the structural frame at all times during construction. This applies to the dead weight of the structure, plus weight and working reactions of all construction equipment placed thereon plus any external forces that may be applied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7264.

Where a building is being constructed in sections, each section constitutes a building as defined in Section 7250.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7265.

Safety belts and nets shall be required in accordance with Article 24 (commencing with Section 1669) of subchapter 4 of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Title 8 of the California Administrative Code, Construction Safety Orders of the Division of Occupational Safety and Health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676.)
-------------------------------------------

7266.

No person shall proceed with any work assigned to or undertaken by him, or require or permit any other person to proceed with work assigned to or undertaken by either, unless the planking or nets required by this article are in place. Violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1498.)
-------------------------------------------

7267.

The Division of Occupational Safety and Health shall enforce this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Elevators, Escalators, Platform and Stairway Chair Lifts, Dumbwaiters, Moving Walks, Automated People Movers, and Other Conveyances [7300. - 7324.2.]

7300.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) It is the purpose of this chapter to promote public safety awareness and to assure, to the extent feasible, the safety of the public and of workers with respect to conveyances covered by this chapter.

(b) The use of unsafe or defective conveyances imposes a substantial probability of serious and preventable injury to employees and the public. The prevention of these injuries and
 protection of employees and the public from unsafe conditions is in the best interest of the people of this state. Therefore, this chapter also establishes minimum standards for persons operating or maintaining conveyances covered by this chapter. These standards include familiarity with the operation and safety functions of the components and equipment, and documented training or experience or both, which shall include, but not be limited to, recognizing the safety hazards and performing the procedures to which they are assigned in conformance with all legal requirements.

(c) This chapter is not intended to prevent the division from implementing regulations, nor to prevent the use of systems, methods, or devices of equivalent or superior quality, strength, fire resistance, code effectiveness, durability, and safety to those required by the law, provided that there is technical documentation to demonstrate that the equivalency of the system,
 method, or device, is at least as effective as that prescribed in ASME A17.1, ASME A17.3, ASME A18.1, or ASCE 21.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1149, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7300.1.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “ASCE 21” means the Automated People Mover Standards, as adopted by the American Society of Civil Engineers.

(b) “ASME A17.1” means the Safety Code for Elevators and Escalators, an American National Standard, as adopted by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers.

(c) “ASME A17.3” means the Safety Code for Existing Elevators and Escalators,
 an American National Standard, as adopted by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers.

(d) “ASME A18.1” means the Safety Standard for Platform Lifts and Stairway Chairlifts, an American National Standard, as adopted by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers.

(e) “Automated people mover” has the same meaning as defined in ASCE 21.

(f) “Board” or “standards board” means the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board.

(g) “Certified qualified conveyance company” means any person, firm, or corporation that (1) possesses a valid contractor’s license if required by Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code and (2) is certified as a qualified conveyance company by the division in accordance with
 this chapter.

(h) “Certified competent conveyance mechanic” means any person who has been determined by the division to have the qualifications and ability of a competent journey-level conveyance mechanic and is so certified by the division in accordance with this chapter.

(i) “Conveyance” means any elevator, dumbwaiter, escalator, moving platform lift, stairway chairlift, material lift or dumbwaiter with automatic transfer device, automated people mover, or other equipment subject to this chapter.

(j) “Division” means the Division of Occupational Safety and Health.

(k) “Dormant elevator, dumbwaiter, or escalator” means an installation placed out of service as specified in ASME A17.1 and ASME A18.1.

(l) “Elevator” means an installation defined as an “elevator” in ASME A17.1.

(m) “Conveyance inspector” means any conveyance safety inspector of the division or other conveyance inspector determined by the division to be qualified pursuant to this chapter.

(n) “Escalator” means an installation defined as an “escalator” in ASME A17.1.

(o) “Existing installation” means an installation defined as an “installation, existing” in ASME A17.1.

(p) “Full maintenance service contract” means an agreement by a certified competent conveyance company and the person owning or having the custody, management, or control of the operation of the conveyance, if the agreement provides that the certified
 competent conveyance company is responsible for effecting repairs necessary to the safe operation of the equipment and will provide services as frequently as is necessary, but no less often than monthly.

(q) “Material alteration” means an alteration as defined in ASME A17.1 or A18.1.

(r) “Moving walk” or “moving sidewalk” means an installation defined as a “moving walk” in ASME A17.1.

(s) “Permit” means a document issued by the division that indicates that the conveyance has had the required safety inspection and tests and fees have been paid as set forth in this chapter.

(t) “Temporary permit” means a document issued by the division which permits the use of a noncompliant conveyance by the general public for a limited time while minor repairs are being
 completed or until permit fees are paid.

(u) “Repair” has the same meaning as defined in ASME A17.1 or A18.1. A “repair” does not require a permit.

(v) “Temporarily dormant elevator, dumbwaiter, or escalator” means a conveyance, the power supply of which has been disconnected by removing fuses and placing a padlock on the mainline disconnect switch in the “off” position. In the case of an elevator or dumbwaiter, the car shall be parked and the hoistway doors shall be in the closed and latched position. A wire seal shall be installed on the mainline disconnect switch by a conveyance inspector of the division. The wire seal and padlock shall not be removed for any purpose without permission from a conveyance inspector of the division. A temporarily dormant elevator, dumbwaiter, or escalator shall not be used again until it has been put in safe running order and is in condition for
 use. Annual inspections by a conveyance inspector shall continue for the duration of the temporarily dormant status. Temporarily dormant status may be renewed annually, but shall not exceed five years. After each inspection, the conveyance inspector shall file a report with the chief of the division describing the current condition of the conveyance.

(w) The meanings of building transportation terms not otherwise defined in this section shall be as defined in the latest editions of ASME A17.1 and ASME A18.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 503, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7300.2.

Except as provided in Section 7300.3, this chapter covers the design, erection, construction, installation, material alteration, inspection, testing, maintenance, repair, service, and operation of the following conveyances and their associated parts and hoistways:

(a) Hoisting and lowering mechanisms equipped with a car or platform which move between two or more landings. This equipment includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Elevators.

(2) Platform lifts and stairway chair lifts.

(b) Power-driven stairways and walkways for carrying persons between landings. This equipment includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Escalators.

(2) Moving walks.

(c) Hoisting and lowering mechanisms equipped with a car which serve two or more landings and are restricted to the carrying of material by limited size or limited access to the car. This equipment includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Dumbwaiters.

(2) Material lifts and dumbwaiters with automatic
 transfer devices.

(d) Automatic guided transit vehicles on guideways with an exclusive right-of-way. This equipment includes, but is not limited to, automated people movers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1149, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7300.3.

Equipment not covered by this chapter includes the following:

(a) Material hoists within the scope of standard A10.5 as adopted by the American National Standards Institute.

(b) Mobile scaffolds, towers, and platforms within the scope of standard A92 as adopted by the American National Standards Institute.

(c) Powered platforms and equipment for exterior and interior
 maintenance within the scope of standard 120.1 as adopted by the American National Standards Institute.

(d) Cranes, derricks, hoists, hooks, jacks, and slings within the scope of standard B30 as adopted by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers.

(e) Industrial trucks within the scope of standard B56 as adopted by the American Society of Mechanical Engineers.

(f) Portable equipment, except for portable escalators that are covered by standard A17.1 as adopted by the American National Standards Institute.

(g) Tiering or piling machines used to move materials to and from storage located and operating entirely within one story.

(h) Equipment for feeding or positioning materials, including
 that equipment used with machine tools or printing presses.

(i) Skip or furnace hoists.

(j) Wharf ramps.

(k) Railroad car lifts or dumpers.

(l) Line jacks, false cars, shafters, moving platforms, and similar equipment used for installing a conveyance by a contractor licensed in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 503, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7300.4.

This chapter does not apply to work that is not related to standards for conveyances that are (a) incorporated in codes promulgated by the American National Standards Institute or the American Society of Mechanical Engineers or (b) included in regulations of the division, in effect immediately prior to January 1, 2003, prescribing conveyance safety orders. Work exempted pursuant to this section includes, but is not limited to, routine nonmechanical maintenance, such as cleaning panels and changing light fixtures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 503, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7301.

No conveyance shall be operated in this state unless a permit for its operation is issued by or in behalf of the division, and unless the permit remains in effect and is kept posted conspicuously on the conveyance. Operation of a conveyance without a permit or failure to post the permit conspicuously shall constitute cause for the division to prohibit use of the conveyance, unless it can be shown that a request for issuance or renewal of a permit has been made and the request has not been acted upon by the division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1149, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7301.1.

(a) On and after June 30, 2003, no conveyance may be erected, constructed, installed, or materially altered, as defined by regulation of the division, unless a permit has been obtained from the division before the work is commenced. A copy of the permit shall be kept at the construction site at all times while the work is in progress and shall be made available for inspection upon request. This section shall not apply to platform lifts and stairway chairlifts installed in a private residence as provided in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision
 (a) of Section 7317.
